Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB404.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 336 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Subject to KRS 18A.140 and 61.080, an employer of seventy-five (75) or more
persons shall not demote, dismiss, discipline, or in any way discriminate against
an employee because he or she is:
(a) A candidate for membership of:
1. The General Assembly;
2. A legislative body of a city;
3. A consolidated local government council;
4. An urban-county government council;
5. A legislative body of a charter county government; or
6. A legislative body of a unified local government;
(b) Currently serving as a member of:
1. The General Assembly;
2. A legislative body of a city;
3. A consolidated local government council;
4. An urban-county government council;
5. A legislative body of a charter county government; or
6. A legislative body of a unified local government;
(c) A member-elect to:
1. The General Assembly;
2. A legislative body of a city;
3. A consolidated local government council;
4. An urban-county government council;
5. A legislative body of a charter county government; or
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 1/7/2026 5:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1599
6. A legislative body of a unified local government; or
(d) Absent from work to perform duties as a member or member-elect of:
1. The General Assembly;
2. A legislative body of a city;
3. A consolidated local government council;
4. An urban-county government council;
5. A legislative body of a charter county government; or
6. A legislative body of a unified local government.
(2) Any employee who is elected or appointed to any qualifying office listed in
subsection (1) of this section may request a leave of absence, and any employer
subject to subsection (1) of this section shall grant the request. The leave of
absence:
(a) May be paid or unpaid; and
(b) Shall not exceed:
1. Three (3) terms of office for a member of the House of
Representatives;
2. Two (2) terms of office for a member of the Senate; or
3. Two (2) terms of office for a member of a legislative body of a city,
consolidated local government council, urban county government
council, legislative body of a charter county government, or legislative
body of a unified local government.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section shall not be construed to:
(a) Prevent the employee from working and being compensated for time worked
during the leave of absence; or
(b) Impair the employee's seniority rights on the job.
Section 2. KRS 336.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon proof that any person employed by the Education and Labor Cabinet as a
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 1/7/2026 5:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1599
labor inspector has taken any part in any strike, lockout or similar labor dispute, the
person shall forfeit his or her office.
(2) The following civil penalties shall be imposed, in accordance with the provisions in
KRS 336.985, for violations of the provisions of this chapter:
(a) Any person who violates KRS 336.110 or 336.130 shall for each offense be
assessed a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more
than one thousand dollars ($1,000);
(b) Any corporation, association, organization, or person that violates KRS
336.190 and 336.200 shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than one
hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each
offense. Each act of violation, and each day during which such an agreement
remains in effect, shall constitute a separate offense;
(c) Any employer who violates the provisions of KRS 336.220 shall be assessed a
civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation;[ and]
(d) Any labor organization who violates KRS 336.135 shall be assessed a civil
penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense;[.]
(e) Any public employer or labor organization that violates KRS 161.158,
164.365, 336.133, 336.134, 336.1341, 336.135, or 336.180 shall be assessed a
civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense; and[.]
(f) Any employer that violates Section 1 of this Act shall be assessed a civil
penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense.
(3) Any labor organization, employer, or other person who directly or indirectly
violates KRS 336.130(3) shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 1/7/2026 5:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1599
(4) Any person aggrieved as a result of any violation or threatened violation of KRS
336.130(3) or Section 1 of this Act may seek abatement of the violation or
threatened violation by petitioning a court of competent jurisdiction for injunctive
relief and shall be entitled to costs and reasonable attorney fees if he or she prevails
in the action.
(5) Any person injured as a result of any violation or threatened violation of KRS
336.130(3) or Section 1 of this Act may recover all damages resulting from the
violation or threatened violation and shall be entitled to costs and reasonable
attorney fees if he or she prevails in the action.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 1/7/2026 5:19 PM Jacketed